src/backend/tsearch/dicts/ispell_sample.affix
compoundwords controlled Z

prefixes

flag *B:
	.       >   RE      # As in enter > reenter

flag E:
	.       >   IN\-    # As in law > in-law

flag U:
    .       >   UN      # As in natural > unnatural

suffixes

flag *J:
	[^E]    >   INGS        # As in cross > crossings

flag *G:
	[^E]    >   ING     # As in cross > crossing

flag *S:
	[^SXZHY]    >   S       # As in bat > bats

flag *A:
	[^AEIOU]Y   >   -Y,IES      # As in imply > implies

flag ~\\:
	[^Y]        >   Y              #~ advarsel > advarsely-
